Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
ENFORCEMENT AND LIABILITY

5-3.5-201. Enforcement - liability.

The attorney general and any obligor of a covered loan may enforce this article with respect to such covered loan in the manner provided for violations of the federal "Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act of 1994", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1639, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the federal reserve board, including, without limitation, 12 CFR 226.32, as set forth in the federal "Truth in Lending Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1640, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the federal reserve board, including the provisions on civil liability, class actions, rescission, correction, and bona fide error. Persons engaged in the purchase, sale, assignment, securitization, or servicing of covered loans shall be liable under this article for the action or inaction of persons originating such loans only in the manner and to the extent provided for violation of the federal "Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act of 1994" and the federal "Truth in Lending Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1641, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the federal reserve board.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire article added, p. 1600, § 1, effective June 7.